North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 14C. Mobility/Modernization Fund.

§ 136-189.20.
Spot Mobility Program.

Of the funds appropriated to the Mobility/Modernization Fund in the Highway Fund, forty percent (40%) of the funds shall be used for a Spot Mobility Program that shall be managed by the State Traffic Engineer of the Department of Transportation. The purpose of the Spot Mobility Program is to provide funding for small projects that will reduce traffic congestion and vehicular delay times. The Department shall develop a quantitative, evidence-based formula to use in selecting projects to receive funding from the Spot Mobility Program. At a minimum, the Department shall consider all of the following in developing the formula required by this section:

The travel-time savings resulting from the proposed project.

Reductions to motor vehicle queues resulting from the proposed project.

The service life of the proposed project.

The benefit-cost ratio of the proposed project.

In selecting projects to receive funding from the Spot Mobility Program, the Department shall give preference to projects that will improve access from the State highway system to a school. For purposes of this section, the term “school” means any facility engaged in the educational instruction of children in any grade or combination of grades from kindergarten through the twelfth grade at which attendance satisfies the compulsory attendance law and includes charter schools as authorized under

G.S. 115C-218.5

.

History.

2019-231, s. 4.12(a).

§ 136-189.21.
Economic development; small construction; industrial access.

Of the funds appropriated to the Mobility/Modernization Fund in the Highway Fund, twelve percent (12%) of the funds shall be used for the following purposes:

For prioritized transportation improvements and infrastructure that expedite commercial growth as well as either job creation or job retention.

For small construction projects recommended by the Chief Engineer in consultation with the Chief Operating Officer and approved by the Secretary of Transportation. Funds used in accordance with this subdivision shall be allocated equally among the 14 highway divisions for small construction projects.

For the development and expansion of access roads to industrial facilities.

History.

2019-231, s. 4.12(a).

§ 136-189.22.
High-impact and low-cost construction projects.

Of the funds appropriated to the Mobility/Modernization Fund in the Highway Fund, forty-eight percent (48%) of the funds shall be used for construction projects that are high impact and low cost. The funds shall be allocated equally among the 14 highway divisions. Projects funded under this section include intersection improvement projects, minor widening projects, and operational improvement projects. The Department shall develop a quantitative, evidence-based formula to use in selecting projects to receive funding under this section. At a minimum, the Department shall consider all of the following in developing the formula required by this section:

The average daily traffic volume of a roadway and whether the proposed project will generate additional traffic.

Any restrictions on a roadway.

Any safety issues with a roadway.

The condition of the lanes, shoulders, and pavement on a roadway.

The sight distance and radius of any intersection on a roadway.

History.

2019-231, s. 4.12(a).

§ 136-189.23.
Annual report.

The Department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and to the Fiscal Research Division an annual report beginning March 1, 2020, detailing (i) the types of projects funded under this Article and (ii) the total amount of funding allocated to each project funded under this Article.

History.

2019-231, s. 4.12(a).